Indiana, session 2026, SB175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-30-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 17. Excessive Speeding
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "excessive speeding" means
operating a vehicle:
(1) in excess of forty (40) miles per hour greater than the
maximum posted speed limit; or
(2) in excess of one hundred (100) miles per hour.
Sec. 2. A person who recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally
commits excessive speeding commits a Class C misdemeanor.
However, the offense is a Class B misdemeanor if the person has a
prior unrelated conviction under this chapter.
Sec. 3. If, within five (5) years, a person has two (2) or more
convictions under section 2 of this chapter, the court shall
recommend immediate suspension of the person's driving
privileges for at least one hundred eighty (180) days but not more
2026 IN 175—LS 6812/DI 151


than one (1) year.
SECTION 2. IC 35-44.1-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) forcibly resists, obstructs, or interferes with a law enforcement
officer or a person assisting the officer while the officer is
lawfully engaged in the execution of the officer's duties;
(2) forcibly resists, obstructs, or interferes with the authorized
service or execution of a civil or criminal process or order of a
court; or
(3) flees from a law enforcement officer after the officer has, by
visible or audible means, including operation of the law
enforcement officer's siren or emergency lights, identified himself
or herself and ordered the person to stop;
commits resisting law enforcement, a Class A misdemeanor, except as
provided in subsection (c).
(b) A person who, having been denied entry by a firefighter, an
emergency medical services provider, or a law enforcement officer,
knowingly or intentionally enters an area that is marked off with barrier
tape or other physical barriers, commits interfering with public safety,
a Class B misdemeanor, except as provided in subsection (c) or (j).
(c) The offense under subsection (a) or (b) is a:
(1) Level 6 felony if:
(A) the person uses a vehicle to commit the offense; or
(B) while committing the offense, the person:
(i) draws or uses a deadly weapon;
(ii) inflicts bodily injury on or otherwise causes bodily injury
to another person; or
(iii) operates a vehicle in a manner that creates a substantial
risk of bodily injury to another person;
(2) Level 5 felony if:
(A) while committing the offense, the person operates a
vehicle in a manner that causes serious bodily injury to another
person; or
(B) the person uses a vehicle to commit the offense and the
person has a prior unrelated conviction under this section
involving the use of a vehicle in the commission of the
offense;
(3) Level 3 felony if, while committing the offense, the person
operates a vehicle in a manner that causes the death or
catastrophic injury of another person; and
(4) Level 2 felony if, while committing any offense described in
2026 IN 175—LS 6812/DI 151


subsection (a), the person operates a vehicle in a manner that
causes the death or catastrophic injury of a firefighter, an
emergency medical services provider, or a law enforcement
officer while the firefighter, emergency medical services provider,
or law enforcement officer is engaged in the firefighter's,
emergency medical services provider's, or officer's official duties.
(d) The offense under subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if, while
committing an offense under:
(1) subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2), the person:
(A) creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to the person or
another person; and
(B) has two (2) or more prior unrelated convictions under
subsection (a); or
(2) subsection (a)(3), the person has two (2) or more prior
unrelated convictions under subsection (a).
(e) If a person uses a vehicle to commit a felony offense under
subsection (c)(1)(B), (c)(2), (c)(3), or (c)(4), as part of the criminal
penalty imposed for the offense, the court shall impose a minimum
executed sentence of at least:
(1) thirty (30) days, if the person does not have a prior unrelated
conviction under this section;
(2) one hundred eighty (180) days, if the person has one (1) prior
unrelated conviction under this section; or
(3) one (1) year, if the person has two (2) or more prior unrelated
convictions under this section.
(f) Notwithstanding IC 35-50-2-2.2 and IC 35-50-3-1, the mandatory
minimum sentence imposed under subsection (e) may not be
suspended.
(g) If a person is convicted of an offense involving the use of a
motor vehicle under:
(1) subsection (c)(1)(A), if the person exceeded the speed limit by
at least twenty (20) miles per hour while committing the offense;
(2) subsection (c)(2); or
(3) subsection (c)(3);
the court may notify the bureau of motor vehicles to suspend or revoke
the person's driver's license in accordance with IC 9-30-4-6.1(b) for the
period described in IC 9-30-4-6.1(d)(1) or IC 9-30-4-6.1(d)(2). The
court shall inform the bureau whether the person has been sentenced
to a term of incarceration. At the time of conviction, the court may
obtain the person's current driver's license and return the license to the
bureau of motor vehicles.
(h) A person who commits an offense described in subsection (c)
2026 IN 175—LS 6812/DI 151


commits a separate offense for each person whose bodily injury,
serious bodily injury, catastrophic injury, or death is caused by a
violation of subsection (c).
(i) A court may order terms of imprisonment imposed on a person
convicted of more than one (1) offense described in subsection (c) to
run consecutively. Consecutive terms of imprisonment imposed under
this subsection are not subject to the sentencing restrictions set forth in
IC 35-50-1-2(c) through IC 35-50-1-2(d).
(j) As used in this subsection, "family member" means a child,
grandchild, parent, grandparent, or spouse of the person. It is a defense
to a prosecution under subsection (b) that the person reasonably
believed that the person's family member:
(1) was in the marked off area; and
(2) had suffered bodily injury or was at risk of suffering bodily
injury;
if the person is not charged as a defendant in connection with the
offense, if applicable, that caused the area to be secured by barrier tape
or other physical barriers.
(k) Notwithstanding:
(1) IC 35-50-2-7(b), and in addition to any other penalties
imposed under this section, the sentencing court shall:
(A) impose a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000); and
(B) recommend the suspension of driving privileges for six
(6) months;
for a person convicted under subsection (c)(1)(A); and
(2) IC 35-50-2-6(b), and in addition to any other penalties
imposed under this section, the sentencing court shall:
(A) impose a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and
(B) recommend the suspension of driving privileges for one
(1) year;
for a person convicted under subsection (c)(2)(B).
SECTION 3. IC 35-52-9.1-62.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 62.5. IC 9-30-17-2 defines a crime
concerning excessive speeding.
2026 IN 175—LS 6812/DI 151